trunk/incubator/apertium-mk-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="/i__lig">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>së</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="një__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/jam__vbjam">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jam</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>është</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemi</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jeni</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>janë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qeshë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qe</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qe</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qemë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qetë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qenë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isha</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishe</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishte</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishim</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishit</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ishin</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qenë</l>
          <r>jam<s n="vbjam"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/kam__vbkam">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kam</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kemi</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>keni</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kanë</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pata</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pate</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pati</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>patëm</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>patët</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>patën</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kisha</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishe</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishte</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishim</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishit</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kishin</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pasur</l>
          <r>kam<s n="vbkam"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ligature"><i/><par n="/i__lig"/></e>
    <e lm="një"><i>një</i><par n="një__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jam"><i/><par n="/jam__vbjam"/></e>
    <e lm="kam"><i/><par n="/kam__vbkam"/></e>
